North Dakota, session 69, SB2245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 20.1-04-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
20.1-04-11. Blinds, boats, and decoys lawfully usable in taking ducks and geese.
Wild ducks and geese may be taken:
1. In the open or from a stationary natural or artificial blind or other place of concealment on land
or water, except a sinkbox.
2. From a floating craft, excluding a sinkbox, if suchthe floating craft is beached:
a. Beached, or fastened within or tied immediately alongside any type of fixed hunting blind,
or from such craft resting;
b. Resting at anchor if authorized by governor's proclamation;
c. Without a motor, propelled exclusively by paddle, oars, or pole; or
d. With a motor, if the craft is at rest and the motor has been turned off.
3. With the aid of artificial decoys. The use, directly or indirectly, of live duck or goose decoys is
not permitted.
A motorboat, sailboat, or other craft may be used to pick up dead or injured birds. An individual may not
shoot from a motorboat, sailboat, or other craft except as provided in this section.

S. B. NO. 2245 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2245.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 3 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State